Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-3717
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) The safety and well-being of abused and neglected children throughout the State of Nebraska should be of paramount concern to the state and its residents;

(2) Court appointed special advocate volunteers provide a unique and vital service to the children they represent and work to ensure the safety and well-being of abused and neglected children; and

(3) Court appointed special advocate volunteers have provided, in many cases, the judges who adjudicate cases with essential information that has not only ensured the safety and well-being of abused and neglected children throughout Nebraska, but has also saved the state thousands of dollars.

Laws 2011, LB463, § 14;

Laws 2026, LB952, § 5.
July 1, 2026